trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.is.dix
    <pardef n="ei/nn__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nir</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nan</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nar</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nni</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nnar</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nni</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nni</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>

    <e lm="einn"><i>ei</i><par n="ei/nn__adj"/></e>
